Vermont, session 2025-2026, H508.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the City
of Burlington as set forth in this act. Voters approved the proposals of
amendment on March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 3 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 3. CITY OF BURLINGTON
* * *
§ 2. ELECTION BOUNDARIES
(a) City districts described. For the annual meeting of 2024 and all City
elections thereafter, the City of Burlington is divided into four electoral
districts, constituted as follows:
(1) East District. The East District shall include all that part of said City
lying easterly and northerly of the following described boundaries: Beginning
at the common boundary between the Cities of Burlington and Winooski in the
Winooski River beneath the Central Vermont Railway bridge downstream of
the Lower Winooski Falls and Salmon Hole; thence westerly in the centerline
of said railroad tracks for 406.6 feet to a point where the centerline of Intervale
Road extended northerly intersects said railroad track centerline
(approximately -73.2028 longitude, 44.4911 latitude); thence southerly along
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 2 of 11
2026
the extension of the centerline of Intervale Road, crossing Riverside Avenue
until the centerline intersects with that of the Archibald Street centerline
extended easterly; thence westerly along the Archibald Street centerline until
the intersection of the Archibald Street centerline and the North Willard Street
centerline; thence southerly along the North Willard Street Centerline until the
intersection of the North Willard Street centerline and the Pearl Street
Centerline; thence westerly along the Pearl Street centerline until intersecting
with the South Winooski Avenue centerline; thence southerly along the South
Winooski Avenue centerline until intersecting the Maple Street centerline;
thence easterly along the Maple Street centerline for 1573.5 feet to a point
where the eastern property boundary of 315 Maple Street extended northerly
intersects Maple Street (approximately -73.2064 longitude, 44.4739 latitude);
thence southerly along the eastern property boundary of 315 Maple Street for
276.5 feet (approximately -73.2064 longitude, 44.4734 latitude); thence 281.4
feet westerly to a point where the southern property boundary of 315 Maple
Street extended westerly intersect with the western boundary of 251 South
Willard Street extended northerly (approximately -73.2071 longitude, 44.4733
latitude), thence 723.7 feet 177° southerly to a point where it intersects the
southern property boundary of 285 South Willard Street extended westerly
(approximately -73.2071 longitude, 44.4719 latitude); thence easterly along the
southern boundary of 285 South Willard Street for 696.5 feet until intersecting
with the South Willard Street centerline (approximately -73.2051 longitude,
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 3 of 11
2026
44.472 latitude); thence northerly along the South Willard Street centerline for
220.9 feet (approximately -73.2052 longitude, 44.4724 latitude); thence
easterly along the southern property boundary of 262 South Willard Street for
557.6 feet (approximately -73.2037 longitude. 44.4725 latitude); thence
northerly along the eastern property boundary of 262 South Willard Street for
89.6 feet to a point where the Juniper Terrace centerline extended westerly
intersects the eastern property boundary of 262 South Willard Street
(approximately 73.2037 longitude, 44.4726 latitude); thence following the
Juniper Terrace centerline easterly until intersecting with the Summit Street
centerline (approximately -73.2021 longitude, 44.4727 latitude); thence
northerly along the Summit Street centerline until reaching the centerline of
Main Street thence following the Main Street centerline easterly 2339.6 feet
(approximately -73.1964 longitude, 44.4753 latitude); thence southwesterly
214° for 136.1 feet (approximately -73.1966 longitude, 44.4751 latitude);
thence southeasterly 98.2 feet (approximately -73.1964 longitude, 44.4749
latitude); thence southwesterly by 213° for 770 feet (approximately -73.1975
longitude, 44.4737 latitude); thence southeasterly by 123° for 477.4 feet until
intersecting with the University Heights centerline (approximately -73.1964
longitude, 44.4732 latitude); thence southerly along the centerline of
University Heights Road 1221.65 feet until intersecting with the PFG Road
centerline, thence westerly by 79° until intersecting with the common
boundary between the Cities of Burlington and South Burlington.
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 4 of 11
2026
(2) Central District. The Central District shall include all that part of the
City bounded as follows: On the east, beginning at the common boundary
between the City of Burlington and Town of Colchester in the Winooski River
at a point intersecting with the centerline of Institute Road extended
northeasterly (approximately -73.2147 longitude, 44.5089 latitude); thence
southerly along the common boundary between the City of Burlington and
Town of Colchester in the Winooski River to a point beneath the Central
Vermont Railway bridge downstream of the Lower Winooski Falls and
Salmon Hole; thence westerly along the East District northern boundary for
406.6 feet to its intersection with the westerly boundary of the East District;
thence southerly along the westerly boundary of the East District to its
intersection with the centerline of Archibald Street, then southerly along the
East District western boundary to the intersection with the centerline of Pearl
Street; thence westerly along the northern boundary of the East District to the
intersection with the centerline of South Winooski Avenue; thence southerly
along the western boundary of the East District to the centerline of Maple
Street; thence westerly along the centerline of Maple Street until its
intersection with the centerline of South Champlain street; thence northerly
along the South Champlain Street centerline until its intersection with the
centerline of King Street; on the south along the centerline of King Street
extended westerly to Lake Champlain; on the west by Lake Champlain; on the
north, beginning at the intersection of the common property boundary between
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 5 of 11
2026
87 North Avenue and 9 Lakeview Terrace extended westerly to Lake
Champlain (approximately -73.2252 longitude, 44.4832 latitude); thence
northeasterly along the extended property boundary between 87 North Avenue
and 9 Lakeview Terrace to its intersection with the centerline of the Central
Vermont Railway railroad track (approximately -73.2239 longitude, 44.4837
latitude); thence northerly and easterly along the centerline of the Central
Vermont Railway railroad track, crossing North Avenue and the Burlington
Beltline, to its intersection with the centerline of Spring Street extended
northwesterly (approximately -73.2183 longitude, 44.4912 latitude); thence
northwesterly along the extension of the centerline of Spring Street to its
intersection with the centerline of Institute Road extended northeasterly
(approximately -73.2281 longitude, 44.4995 latitude); thence northeasterly
along the extension of the centerline of Institute Road extended to its
intersection with the common boundary between the City of Burlington and
Town of Colchester in the Winooski River (approximately -73.2139 longitude,
44.5077 latitude).
(3) South District. The South District shall include all that part of the
City south of the southern boundaries of the East and Central Districts.
(4) North District. The North District shall include all that part of the
City north of the northern boundary of the Central District.
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 6 of 11
2026
(b) Wards described. Each of the City of Burlington’s four electoral
districts set forth in subsection (a) of this section hereby comprises two wards,
each of which is constituted as follows:
(1) East District—Ward 1 and Ward 8.
(A) The East District is divided into two wards by the following
boundary: Beginning at the center of the intersection of Brooks Avenue and
South Willard Street; thence easterly along the Brooks Avenue centerline until
intersecting with the centerline of North Prospect Street; thence southerly
along the centerline of North prospect Street to the intersection of the
centerline of Colchester Avenue to the intersection of the centerline of Mary
Fletcher Drive; thence southerly along the centerline of Mary Fletcher Drive
for 331.58 feet (approximately -73.196 longitude, 44.4802 latitude); thence
southerly along the western side and easterly along the southern side of the
UVM Medical Center building for 1854.5 feet until a point at the center of the
intersection of Beaumont Avenue and Mary Fletcher Drive (approximately -
73.1932 longitude, 44.4788 latitude); thence south along the Beaumont
Avenue centerline to the intersection of Carrigan Drive; thence following
Carrigan Drive westerly for 199.1 feet (approximately -73.1932 longitude,
55.5756 latitude); thence travelling southwesterly for 821.3 feet along the
UVM service road on the eastern border of the southeastern wing of the UVM
Jeffords Hall until a point at the intersection of the service road and the
centerline of University Heights extended northeasterly (approximately -
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 7 of 11
2026
73.1947 longitude, 44.4751 latitude); thence southwesterly along the centerline
of University Heights 977.3 feet (approximately -73.1962 longitude, 44.4735
latitude); thence continuing southeasterly along the centerline of the driveway
bounding the western side of the UVM Living/Learning Commons for 404.3
feet (approximately -73.1952 longitude, 44.4731 latitude); thence continuing
south along the eastern side of UVM’s University Heights dorms until
intersecting with PFG Road; thence continuing easterly along the western
extension of the PFG Road centerline for 601.2 feet until intersecting with the
common boundary between the Cities of Burlington and South Burlington.
(B) Ward 1 lies to the north and east of the boundary described in
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1), and Ward 8 lies to the south and west.
(2) Central District—Ward 2 and Ward 3.
(A) The Central District is divided into two wards by the following
boundary: Beginning at the intersection of the common property boundary
between 85 North Avenue and 9 Lakeview Terrace extended westerly to Lake
Champlain (approximately -73.2252 longitude, -44.4832 latitude); thence
northeasterly along the extended property boundary between 87 North Avenue
and 9 Lakeview Terrace to its intersection with the centerline of the Central
Vermont Railway railroad track (approximately -73.224 longitude, 44.4837
latitude); thence southeasterly along the centerline of the Central Vermont
Railway railroad track to a point intersecting with the northwestern property
boundary of 300 Lake Street extended southwesterly (approximately -73.2234
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 8 of 11
2026
longitude, 44.4832 latitude); thence northeasterly to a point at the intersection
of the northwestern property boundary of 300 Lake Street extended
northeasterly with the centerline of Depot Street (approximately -73.2223
longitude, 44.4837 latitude); thence northerly along the centerline of Depot
Street to the intersection with the centerline of Lakeview Terrace; thence
easterly along the centerline of Lakeview Terrace extended westerly until
intersecting with the centerline of North Avenue; thence northerly along the
centerline of North Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of North
Street; thence easterly along the centerline of North Street until intersecting
with the North Union Street centerline; thence southerly following the North
Union Street centerline until intersecting with the Loomis Street centerline;
thence easterly along the Loomis Street centerline to the intersection of the
centerlines of Loomis Street and South Willard Avenue.
(B) Ward 2 lies to the north of the boundary described in subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (2), and Ward 3 lies to the south.
(3) South District—Ward 5 and Ward 6.
(A) The South District is divided into two wards by the following
boundary: Beginning at the intersection of the centerlines of Maple Street and
Church Street; thence southerly along the centerline of Church Street to the
intersection with the centerline of Adams Street; thence westerly along the
centerline of Adams Street to the intersection with the centerline of Saint Paul
Street; thence southerly along the Saint Paul Street centerline to its intersection
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 9 of 11
2026
with the centerline of Shelburne Street; thence southerly along the centerline of
Shelburne Street to its intersection with the centerline of Flynn Avenue; thence
easterly along the centerline of Flynn Avenue extended easterly to the common
boundary between the Cities of Burlington and South Burlington.
(B) Ward 5 lies to the west of the boundary described in subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (3), and Ward 6 lies to the east.
(4) North District—Ward 4 and Ward 7.
(A) The North District is divided into two wards by the following
boundary: Beginning at the centerline of Institute Road extended southwesterly
to Lake Champlain; thence northeasterly to the intersection of Institute Road
with the centerline of North Avenue; thence northerly along the centerline of
North Avenue to its intersection with the centerline of Fairfield Drive; thence
westerly along the centerline of Fairfield Drive to its intersection with the
western property boundary of 39 Westward Drive extended southerly
(approximately -73.2685 longitude, 44.5257 latitude); thence northerly along
the western property boundary of 39 Westward Drive, until intersecting with
the centerline of Westward Drive; thence southwesterly along the centerline of
Westward Drive to the intersection with the Northshore Drive centerline;
thence northerly along the Northshore Drive centerline until intersecting with
the Clair Pointe Road centerline (point); thence westerly along the southern
property boundary of the Claire Pointe condominium development
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 10 of 11
2026
(approximately -73.2686 longitude, 44.5286 latitude), and then extended to
Lake Champlain.
(B) Ward 4 lies to the west of the boundary described in subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (4), and Ward 7 lies to the east.
(5) Ward map reference. Reference is also made to a map entitled “Ward
Redistricting, 8 Wards — 4 Districts, 12 Councilors, Approved Map
(December 2 V1.3), Map Date: December 8, 2022 “ located in the Burlington
Chief Administrative Officer’s office in further aid of the description of the
wards set forth in this subsection.
The election area boundaries established pursuant to 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. M-7 shall remain in effect until changed by the City Council,
which is authorized to make changes to the boundaries of the election areas
pursuant to this section in order to provide an equal division of population
among them in accordance with data produced by the U.S. Census Bureau.
The City Council may change election area boundaries following the taking of
the decennial census and whenever necessary to correct an unconstitutional
division of population among City districts or wards. Changes shall be
approved by the voters at an annual or special meeting of the City and shall
become effective immediately upon approval unless a later date is established
by the City meeting vote.
* * *
VT LEG #389243 v.1

No. M-8 Page 11 of 11
2026
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: April 27, 2026
VT LEG #389243 v.1